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DTC P0340/ 12CamshaftPositionSensor”A”Circuit
(Bank 1 orSingleSensor)

DTC P034 1/12CamshaftPositionSensor”A”Circuit
Range/Performance (Single Sensor)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The camshaft position sensor (G signal) consists of a magnet iron core and pickup coil.
The G signal plate has 1 tooth on its outer circumference and is installed on the LH camshaft timing pulley.
When the camshafts rotate, protrusion on the signal plate and air gap on the pickup coil change, causing
fluctuations in the magnetic field and generating a voltage in the pickup coil.
The NE signal plate has 34 teeth and is mounted on the crankshaft. The NE signal sensor generates 34
signals at every engine revolution. The engine control ECU detects the crankshaft angle and the engine rev-
olution based on the NE signals, and the cylinder and the angle of the G2 based on the combination of the
G and NE signals.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

P0340/12

No camshaft position sensor signal to engine control ECU
during cranking
(2 tripdetection logic)P0340/12

No camshaft position sensor signal to engine control ECU
with engine speed 600 rpm or more (1 trip detection logic)

SOpenorshort incamshaftpositionsensorcircuit
S Camshaftposition sensor

P0341/12

Whilecrankshaft rotates twice,camshaftpositionsensor
signalwill be input toenginecontrolECU12 timesormore
(1 trip detection logic)
SHint:
Under normal condition, the camshaft position signal is
input into the engine control ECU 1 times per 2 engine
revolutions

SCamshaftpositionsensor
SLHcamshaft timingpulley
SJumping teethof timingbelt

SEnginecontrolECU

Reference: Inspection using the oscilloscope.
The correct waveform is as shown.

Tester Connection Specified Condition

G2+(E7 −27) − G2− (E7−32)
C t f i h

NE+(E7 −25) − NE− (E7−24)
Correctwaveform isasshown
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MONITOR DESCRIPTION
If there is no signal from the camshaft position sensor even though the engine is turning, or if the rotation
of the camshaft and the crankshaft is not synchronized, the engine control ECU interprets this as a malfunc-
tion of the sensor.
This monitor runs for 10 seconds (the first 10 seconds of engine idle) after the engine is started.

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC P0335 on page DI−152.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Read freeze framedatausing thehand −held tester.Freeze framedata records theengineconditionswhen
a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the vehicle was
runningorstopped, if theenginewaswarmedupornot, if theair −fuel ratiowas leanor rich,aswell asother
data from the time when a malfunction occurred.

1 Checkresistanceofcamshaftpositionsensor.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the C1 camshaft position sensor connector.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between terminals 1 and 2.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

1 − 2 950 to1,250 � (at20 ˚ C(68 ˚ F))

NG Replace camshaft position sensor.

OK
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2 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine control ECU
and camshaft position sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the C1 camshaft position sensor connector.
(b) Disconnect the E9 engine control ECU connector.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
tors.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

Camshaftpositionsensor (C1 −1) −
G2+(E9 −27)

Below1 �

Camshaftpositionsensor (C1 −2) −
G2− (E9−32)

Below1 �

Camshaftpositionsensor (C1 −1)or
G2+(E9 −27) − Bodyground

10k � orhigher

Camshaftpositionsensor (C1 −2)or
G2− (E9−32) − Bodyground

10k � orhigher

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

3 Check sensor installation (Camshaft position sensor).

CHECK:
Check the camshaft position sensor installation.

NG Tighten sensor.

OK
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4 Inspect teeth of LH camshaft timing belt pulley.

PREPARATION:
Remove theLHcamshaft timingbeltpulley (SeePub.No.RM630E,pageEM −14).
CHECK:
Check the LH camshaft timing belt pulley.

NG Replace LH camshaft timing pulley.

OK

Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E,pageFI −74).


